test/src/morphology/V-miciso_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - miciso - ok : # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninipân
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinipân
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: miciso
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nipânwan
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3iSg: nipânm
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninipânmin
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kinipânmin
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinipânm
     miciso+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: nipânwag
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+1Sg: ninipânsiin
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kinipânsiin
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Sg: nipânsiin
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3oSg: nipânsiiwan
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3iSg: nipânsiim
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+1Pl: ninipânsiimin
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+12Pl: kinipânsiimin
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kinipânsiim
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Ind+Prs+3Pl: micisosiiwag

     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+1Sg: nipânyaan
     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+2Sg: nipânyan
     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+3Sg: nipând
     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+3oSg: micisonid
     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+3iSg: micisong
     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+1Pl: nipânyaang
     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+12Pl: nipânyang
     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+2Pl: nipânyeg
     miciso+V+IA+Sbj+3Pl: micisowaad
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+1Sg: micisosiwaan
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+2Sg: micisosiwan
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3Sg: micisosig
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3oSg: [micisosinid, micisosinig]
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3iSg: micisosing
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+1Pl: micisosiwaang
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+12Pl: micisosiwang
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+2Pl: micisosiweg
     miciso+V+IA+Neg+Sbj+3Pl: micisosiwaa

     miciso+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: micison
     miciso+V+IA+Imp+Imm+1Pl: nipândaa
     miciso+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: [micisok, micisog]
     miciso+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Sg: micisoken
     miciso+V+IA+Imp+Int+1Pl: micisosiidaa
     miciso+V+IA+Imp+Int+2Pl: micisokegon
     miciso+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Sg: micisokan
     miciso+V+IA+Imp+Dur+2Pl: micisokeg
